Idaho statutes. Title 72 WORKER’S COMPENSATION AND RELATED LAWS — INDUSTRIAL COMMISSION
Chapter 13 EMPLOYMENT SECURITY LAW
§ 72-1347A. Employment security reserve fund — Special administration fund.

There is established in the state treasury a special trust fund, separate and apart from all other public funds of this state, to be known as the employment security reserve fund, hereinafter “reserve fund.” Except as provided herein, all proceeds from the reserve tax defined in subsection (2) of this section shall be paid into the reserve fund. The moneys in the reserve fund may be used by the director for loans to the employment security fund, section 72-1346, Idaho Code, as security for loans from the federal unemployment insurance trust fund, and for the repayment of any interest-bearing advances, including interest, made under title XII of the social security act, 42 U.S.C. 1321 through 1324, and shall be available to the director for expenditure in accordance with the provisions of this section. The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the reserve fund and shall invest said moneys in accordance with law. The state treasurer shall disburse the moneys from the reserve fund in accordance with the directions of the director.

A reserve tax is imposed on all covered employers required to pay contributions pursuant to section 72-1350, Idaho Code, except deficit-rated employers who have been assigned a taxable wage rate from deficit rate class six pursuant to section 72-1350(8)(a), Idaho Code. The reserve tax shall be due and payable at the same time and in the same manner as contributions. If the reserve fund is less than one percent (1%) of state taxable wages in the penultimate year as of September 30 of the preceding calendar year, the reserve tax rate for all eligible, standard-rated and deficit-rated employers shall be equal to the taxable wage rate then in effect less the assigned contribution rate and training tax rate. The provisions of this chapter which apply to the payment and collection of contributions also apply to the payment and collection of the reserve tax, including the same calculations, assessments, method of payment, penalties, interest, costs, liens, injunctive relief, collection procedures and refund procedures. In the administration of the provisions of this section and the collection of the reserve tax, the director is granted all rights, authority, and prerogatives granted the director under the provisions of this chapter. Moneys collected from an employer delinquent in paying contributions and reserve taxes shall first be applied to pay any penalty and interest imposed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and shall then be applied pro rata to pay delinquent contributions to the employment security fund, section 72-1346, Idaho Code, and delinquent reserve taxes to the reserve fund pursuant to this section. Any interest and penalties collected pursuant to this subsection shall be paid into the state employment security administrative and reimbursement fund, section 72-1348, Idaho Code, and any interest or penalties refunded under this subsection shall be paid out of that same fund. Reserve taxes paid pursuant to this subsection may not be deducted in whole or in part by any employer from the wages of individuals in its employ. All reserve taxes collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited in the clearing account of the employment security fund, section 72-1346, Idaho Code, for clearance only and shall not become part of such fund. After clearance, the moneys shall be deposited in the reserve fund established in subsection (1) of this section. No reserve tax shall be imposed for any calendar year if, as of September 30 of the preceding calendar year, the balance of the reserve fund equals or exceeds one percent (1%) of the state taxable wages for the penultimate calendar year, or exceeds forty-nine percent (49%) of the actual balance of the employment security fund, section 72-1346, Idaho Code.

The interest earned from investment of the reserve fund shall be deposited in a fund established in the state treasurer’s office, to be known as the department of labor special administration fund, hereinafter “special administration fund.” The moneys in the special administration fund shall be held separate and apart from all other public funds of this state. The state treasurer shall be the custodian of this fund and may invest said moneys in accordance with law. Any interest earned on said moneys shall be deposited in the special administration fund.

Administrative costs related to the reserve fund and the special administration fund shall be paid from federal administrative grants received under title III of the social security act, to the extent permitted by federal law, and then from the special administration fund.

§ 72-1347B. Workforce development training fund. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 47, § 3, effective March 12, 2018. For present comparable provisions,§ 72-1201 et seq.

§ 72-1348. State employment security administrative and reimbursement fund.

There is created in the state treasury the “state employment security administrative and reimbursement fund.” Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 72-1346 and 72-1347, Idaho Code, the fund shall consist of:

All penalties and all interest on judgments or accounts secured by liens collected pursuant to the provisions of sections 72-1347A and 72-1354 through 72-1364, Idaho Code, but only after such interest and penalties have been deposited in the clearing account and are thereafter transferred to this fund in such amounts as, in the discretion of the director, will leave a sufficient balance of interest and penalties in the clearing account to pay refunds; and

Reed act moneys appropriated for the purchase of land and buildings pursuant to section 72-1346(5), Idaho Code.

Moneys referred to in subsection (1)(a) of this section are perpetually appropriated to the director and may be used upon written authorization of the board of examiners for any lawful purpose, including, but not limited to:

As a revolving fund to cover expenditures for which federal funds have been duly requested but not yet received, subject to reimbursement upon receipt of the federal funds;

For the payment of costs of administration including costs not validly chargeable against federal grants;

For the payment of refunds of penalties pursuant to section 72-1357, Idaho Code; and

For the purchase of land and buildings for the purpose of providing office space for the department.

Moneys referred to in subsection (1)(b) of this section may be used by the department to acquire for and in the name of the state by term purchase agreement lands and buildings for office space for the department at such places as the director finds necessary. An agreement made for the purchase of premises pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to the approval of the attorney general as to form and title.

Premises purchased pursuant to this section shall be used for the department or, if it is desirable to move the department, similar space will be furnished by the state to the department without further payment therefor by the United States.

§ 72-1349. Payment of contributions — Limitation of actions.

Contributions shall be reported and paid to the department on taxable wages for each calendar year equal to the amount determined in accordance with section 72-1350, Idaho Code. Contributions on wages paid to an individual under another state unemployment insurance law, or paid by an employer’s predecessor during the calendar year, shall be counted in complying with this provision.

Contributions shall accrue and become reportable and payable to the department by each covered employer for each calendar quarter with respect to wages for covered employment. Such contributions shall become due and be paid by each covered employer to the director for the employment security fund and shall not be deducted from the wages of individuals employed by such employer. All moneys required to be paid by a covered employer pursuant to this chapter shall immediately, upon becoming due and payable, become or be deemed money belonging to the state, and every covered employer shall hold or be deemed to hold said money separately, aside, or in trust from any other funds, moneys or accounts, for the state of Idaho for payment in the manner and at the times provided by law.

The contributions reportable and payable to the department by each covered employer, with respect to covered employment, accruing in each calendar quarter, shall be reported and paid to the department on or before the last day of the month following the close of said calendar quarter.

The director may, for good cause shown by a covered employer, extend the time for payment of his contributions or any part thereof, but no such extension of time shall postpone the due date more than sixty (60) days. Contributions with respect to which an extension of time for payment has been granted shall be paid on or before the last day of the period of the extension.

Whenever it appears to be essential to the proper administration of this chapter that collection of the contributions of a covered employer must be made more often than quarterly, the director shall have authority to demand payment of the contributions forthwith.

In accordance with rules the director may prescribe, any person or persons entering into a formal contract with the state, any county, city, town, school or irrigation district, or any quasi-public corporation of the state, for the construction, alteration, or repair of any public building or public work, the contract price of which exceeds the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) may be required before commencing such work, to execute a surety bond in an amount sufficient to cover contributions when due. If the director, who shall approve said bond, determines that said bond has become insufficient, he may require that a new bond be provided in the amount he directs. Failure on the part of the employer covered by the bond to pay the full amount of his contributions when due shall render the surety liable on said bond as though the surety was the employer and subject to the other provisions of this chapter.

In the payment of any contributions a fractional part of a dollar shall be disregarded unless it amounts to fifty cents (50¢) or more, in which case it shall be increased to one dollar ($1.00).

§ 72-1349A. Financing of benefit payments by nonprofit organizations and governmental entities.

Benefits paid to employees of governmental entities and nonprofit organizations shall be financed in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Liability for contributions and election of reimbursements. A nonprofit organization or governmental entity shall pay contributions under the provisions of section 72-1349, Idaho Code, unless it elects, in accordance with this section, to pay to the director an amount equal to the full amount of regular benefits paid and the amount paid for extended benefits for which the department is not reimbursed by the federal government, for any reason including, but not limited to, payments made as a result of a determination or payments erroneously paid, or paid as a result of a determination of eligibility, which is subsequently reversed if said payment or any portion thereof was made as a result of wages earned in the employ of such organization or entity. Any sums recovered by the department from a claimant as a result of said payments shall be credited to the account of the nonprofit organization or governmental entity that reimbursed the fund for the payment of said benefits. Where such benefits are paid utilizing wages paid by two (2) or more employers, the portion of benefits to be repaid by the organization or entity shall be its proportionate share. This shall be computed on the basis of the relationship between wages utilized that were earned for services performed for such organization or entity and the total wages utilized in paying such benefits.

Any nonprofit organization or governmental entity may elect to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions, provided it files with the director a written notice of election not later than thirty (30) days prior to the beginning of any taxable year or within thirty (30) days after the date of the final determination that such organization or entity is subject to this chapter. Such election shall be effective for not less than two (2) full taxable years after the election is made, and will continue to be in effect until terminated. The organization or entity must file with the director a written notice of termination of such election not later than thirty (30) days prior to the beginning of the taxable year for which such termination shall first be effective. The director may, in his discretion, terminate an election as provided in this section or extend the period within which a notice of election or a notice of termination must be filed. The director shall notify each nonprofit organization and governmental entity of any determination he makes of its status as an employer and of the effective date of any election that it makes and of any termination of such election.

Reimbursement payments. Payments in lieu of contributions shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this subsection, including either paragraph (a) or paragraph (b).

At the end of each calendar quarter, or at the end of any other period as determined by the director, the director shall bill each organization or entity (or group of organizations or entities) that has elected to make payments in lieu of contributions for an amount equal to the full amount of regular benefits paid, and the amount paid for extended benefits for which the department is not reimbursed by the federal government, if paid as a result of wages earned in the employ of such organization or entity.
(b) Payment in advance. Nonprofit organizations or governmental entities may elect to make payments in lieu of contributions in advance of actual billing for payment costs. Advance payments shall be made as follows: At the end of each calendar quarter, the nonprofit organization or governmental entity shall pay one percent (1%) of its total quarterly payroll unless the director determines that a lesser percentage will cover the cost of payment of benefits to the employees of said employer. For purposes of this section, the total quarterly payroll for school districts shall be computed based upon only those school districts that have elected cost reimbursement status. Such payments shall become due and payable within thirty (30) days following the quarter ending.

Bond requirements. Any nonprofit organization that elects to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions may be required to obtain and deposit with the director a surety bond approved by the director. The amount of the bond shall be determined by the director on the basis of potential liability for benefit costs of each employing nonprofit organization. Such bond shall be in force for a period of not less than two (2) years, and shall be renewed not less frequently than two (2) year intervals for as long as the organization continues to be liable for payments in lieu of contributions. The director shall require adjustments to be made in the bond filed as deemed appropriate. When upward adjustments are required, the adjusted bond shall be filed within thirty (30) days of the date notice of the required adjustment was mailed. Failure by an organization covered by such bond to pay the full amount of payments due, together with interest and penalties, as provided in section 72-1354, Idaho Code, shall render the surety liable on said bond to the extent of the bond, as though the surety was a liable organization.

Failure to pay timely. If any nonprofit organization or governmental entity is delinquent in making payments in lieu of contributions, the director may terminate such employer’s election to make payments in lieu of contributions as of the beginning of the next taxable year, and such termination shall be effective for that and the next taxable year. Any nonprofit organization or governmental entity becoming delinquent in making payments in lieu of contributions shall be subject to the same penalty provisions as any other covered employer as provided in this chapter.

Appeals procedure. Administrative determinations issued pursuant to this section shall become final unless, within fourteen (14) days after notice as provided in section 72-1368(5), Idaho Code, an appeal is filed with the department in accordance with the department’s rules. Appeal proceedings shall be in accordance with the provisions of section 72-1361, Idaho Code.

In the payment of any payments in lieu of contributions, a fractional part of a dollar shall be disregarded unless it amounts to fifty cents (50¢) or more, in which case it shall be increased to one dollar ($1.00).

A group of such organizations or entities may elect, with the approval of the director, to act as a group in fulfilling the requirements of this chapter.

At the end of such taxable year, the director shall compute the benefit costs attributable to the employer as provided in subsection (2) of this section. The director will then debit the employer’s account with these costs. When payments exceed benefit costs, either the employer will be credited on subsequent benefit costs with the overpayment or, at the director’s discretion, the overpayment will be refunded to the employer. When payments are not sufficient to pay benefit costs, either the employer will be billed the additional amount necessary to pay such costs or, at the director’s discretion, the employer’s advance payment rate for the next taxable year will be set at a rate that will cover such costs.

§ 72-1349B. Financing of benefits payments by professional employers and their clients.

Nonprofit organizations and governmental entities excepted. Financing of benefits for workers assigned by a professional employer to a nonprofit organization or a governmental entity shall be paid as provided in section 72-1349A, Idaho Code. Financing of benefits for workers assigned by a professional employer to any entity other than a nonprofit organization or governmental entity shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Liability for contributions. Unless a professional employer meets the minimum requirements of this chapter, its client shall remain liable as a covered employer for any payments due under the provisions of this chapter. During the term of a professional employer arrangement, a professional employer is liable for the payment of all moneys due pursuant to this chapter as a result of wages paid to employees assigned to a client company, except compensation paid to sole proprietors or partners in the client company.

Joint and several liability. A client is jointly and severally liable for any unpaid moneys due under the provisions of this chapter from the professional employer for wages paid to workers assigned to the client.

Reporting requirements. The professional employer shall report and make all payments under its state employer account number. The professional employer shall keep separate records and submit separate quarterly wage reports for each of its clients. The professional employer shall pay contributions for its clients collectively using the professional employer’s contribution rate unless it elects to pay the contribution for certain clients individually in which instance the contribution shall be paid using the individual client’s contribution rate.

Interested party. As between a professional employer and its client, the professional employer company shall be deemed to be the interested party for purposes of section 72-1323, Idaho Code, and all proceedings to determine rights to benefits under the provisions of this chapter.

Temporary workers. The provisions of this section do not apply to an entity that provides temporary workers on a temporary help basis, provided that the entity is liable as the employer for all payments due under the provisions of this chapter as a result of wages paid to those temporary workers.

Rebuttable presumption. When a professional employer assigns workers to only one (1) client and its affiliates, there is a rebuttable presumption that the client entered into a professional employer arrangement to avoid calculation of the proper taxable wage rate. If the professional employer fails to rebut this presumption, the director, pursuant to section 72-1353, Idaho Code, shall issue an administrative determination of coverage holding the client to be the covered employer for purposes of this chapter.

A client ceasing to pay wages. Whenever a client ceases to pay wages, such client shall be subject to termination of its employer account and experience rating records in the same manner as any other employer, in accordance with the provisions of sections 72-1351 and 72-1352, Idaho Code. If a client which has ceased to pay wages subsequently becomes subject to this chapter because it resumes paying wages, it will be assigned the appropriate experience rate in accordance with the provisions of section 72-1351, Idaho Code.
(9) Succession of experience factors. Whenever a professional employer arrangement is entered, the separate account and experience factors of payroll and reserve shall be transferred to the professional employer for the purpose of determining the professional employer’s contribution rate to be paid on behalf of the client. Upon the expiration or termination of the professional employer arrangement, so much of the professional employer’s separate account and experience factors of payroll and reserve as is attributable to the client shall be transferred to the terminating client for the purpose of determining the client’s subsequent rate of contribution. In the event the professional employer elects to pay the client’s contribution separately as provided in subsection (4) of this section, then the client’s experience factors of payroll and reserve shall remain with the client employer for the duration of the professional employer arrangement.

§ 72-1349C. Treatment of Indian tribes.

In addition to the definition provided in section 72-1315, Idaho Code, the term “covered employer” shall also include any Indian tribe for which service in covered employment is performed.

In addition to the definition provided in section 72-1316, Idaho Code, the term “covered employment” shall also include service performed in the employ of an Indian tribe as defined in section 3306(u) of the federal unemployment tax act (FUTA), provided such service is excluded from “employment” as defined in FUTA solely by reason of section 3306(c)(7), FUTA, and is not otherwise excluded from covered employment under this chapter. For purposes of this section, the exemptions from covered employment in sections 72-1316A(5) and (9), Idaho Code, shall be applicable to services performed in the employ of an Indian tribe.

Benefits based on service in covered employment as that term is defined in this section, shall be payable in the same amount, on the same terms and subject to the same conditions as benefits payable on the basis of other service under this chapter.

Indian tribes, or tribal units meaning subdivisions, subsidiaries or business enterprises wholly owned by such Indian tribe, subject to this chapter shall pay contributions under the same terms and conditions as all other covered employers unless the tribe elects to pay into the state unemployment fund amounts equal to the amount of benefits attributable to service in the employ of the Indian tribe.

Indian tribes electing to make payments in lieu of contributions shall make such election in the same manner and under the same conditions as provided in section 72-1349A, Idaho Code, pertaining to nonprofit organizations and governmental entities subject to this chapter. Indian tribes shall determine if reimbursement for benefits paid will be elected by the tribe as a whole, by individual tribal units, or by combinations of individual tribal units.

Indian tribes or tribal units shall be billed for the full amount of benefits attributable to service in the employ of the Indian tribe or tribal unit on the same basis as other employing units that have elected to make payments in lieu of contributions.

At the discretion of the director, any Indian tribe or tribal unit that elects to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions may be required to obtain and deposit with the director a surety bond approved by the director. The amount of the bond shall be determined by the director based on the employing entity’s potential liability for benefit costs. Such bond shall be in force for a period of not less than two (2) years, and shall be renewed not less frequently than two (2) year intervals for as long as the Indian tribe or tribal unit continues to be liable for payments in lieu of contributions. The director may require adjustments to be made in the bond filed. When upward adjustments are required, the adjusted bond shall be filed within thirty (30) days of the date notice of the required adjustment was mailed. Failure by an Indian tribe or tribal unit covered by such bond to pay the full amount of payments due, together with interest and penalties as provided in section 72-1354, Idaho Code, shall render the surety liable on said bond to the extent of the bond, as though the surety was a liable organization.

Failure of the Indian tribe or tribal unit to make required payments, including assessments of interest and penalty, within ninety (90) days of receipt of the bill shall cause the Indian tribe to lose the option to make payments in lieu of contributions as described in subsection (4) of this section, for the following tax year unless payment in full is received before contribution rates for the next tax year are computed.
(a) Any Indian tribe that loses the option to make payments in lieu of contributions due to late payment or nonpayment as described in this subsection (5) of this section, shall have such option reinstated if, after a period of one (1) year, all contributions have been made timely, provided no contributions, payments in lieu of contributions for benefits paid, penalties or interest remain outstanding.

Notices of payment and reporting delinquency to Indian tribes and their tribal units shall include information that failure to make full payment within the prescribed time frame:

Shall cause the Indian tribe to be liable for taxes under the federal unemployment tax act;

Shall cause the Indian tribe to lose the option to make payments in lieu of contributions; and

Could cause the Indian tribe to be excepted from the definition of “covered employer” as provided in subsection (1) of this section, and services in the employ of the Indian tribe as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to be excepted from “covered employment.”

An Indian tribe and its tribal units shall be jointly and severally liable for all payments due under this chapter, including assessments of interest and penalties.

Extended benefits paid that are attributable to service in the employ of an Indian tribe and not reimbursed by the federal government shall be financed in their entirety by such Indian tribe or tribal unit.

If an Indian tribe fails to make payments required under this section, including assessments of interest and penalty, within ninety (90) days of a final notice of delinquency, or fails to timely file a required bond, the director shall immediately notify the United States internal revenue service and the United States department of labor.

(b) Failure of the Indian tribe or any tribal unit thereof to make required payments, including assessments of interest and penalty, after all collection activities deemed necessary by the director have been exhausted, shall cause services performed for such tribe to not be treated as “covered employment” for purposes of subsection (2) of this section.

(c) The director may determine that any Indian tribe that loses coverage under paragraph (b) of this subsection, may have services performed for such tribe again included as “covered employment” for purposes of subsection (2) of this section, if all contributions, payments in lieu of contributions, penalties and interest have been paid.

§ 72-1349D. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 72-1350. Taxable wage base and taxable wage rates.

All remuneration for personal services as defined in section 72-1328, Idaho Code, equal to the average annual wage in covered employment for the penultimate calendar year, rounded to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars ($100), or the amount of taxable wage base specified in the federal unemployment tax act, whichever is higher, shall be the taxable wage base for purposes of this chapter.

Prior to December 31 of each year, the director shall determine the taxable wage rates for the following calendar year for all covered employers, except cost reimbursement employers, in accordance with this section. If the desired fund size multiplier set forth in subsection (3) of this section is revised with an effective date that is prior to January 1 of the following year, the director shall issue adjusted taxable wage rates as soon as practicable and in accordance with the revised multiplier’s effective date. Employers shall receive a credit against future taxes under this act for any overpayments resulting from tax payments made before the amended taxable wage rates are adjusted.

An average high cost ratio shall be determined by calculating the average of the three (3) highest benefit cost rates in the twenty (20) year period ending with the preceding year. For the purposes of this section, the “benefit cost rate” is the total annual benefits paid, including the state’s share of extended benefits but excluding the federal share of extended benefits and cost-reimbursable benefits, divided by the total annual covered wages excluding cost-reimbursable wages. The resulting average high cost ratio is multiplied by the desired fund size multiplier and the result, for the purposes of this section, is referred to as the “average high cost multiple” (AHCM). The desired fund size multiplier shall be eight tenths (0.8) and shall increase to nine tenths (0.9) on and after January 1, 2012; to one (1) on and after January 1, 2013; to one and one-tenth (1.1) on and after January 1, 2014; to one and two-tenths (1.2) on and after January 1, 2015; to one and three-tenths (1.3) on and after January 1, 2016; to one and four-tenths (1.4) on and after January 1, 2017; and to one and three-tenths (1.3) on and after January 1, 2018.

The fund balance ratio shall be determined by dividing the actual balance of the employment security fund, section 72-1346, Idaho Code, and the reserve fund, section 72-1347A, Idaho Code, on September 30 of the current calendar year by the wages paid by all covered employers in Idaho, except cost reimbursement employers, in the preceding calendar year.

The base tax rate shall be determined as follows:

Divide the fund balance ratio by the AHCM;

Subtract the quotient obtained from the calculation in paragraph (a) of this subsection from the number two (2);

Multiply the remainder obtained from the calculation in paragraph (b) of this subsection by two and one-tenth percent (2.1%). The product obtained from this calculation shall equal the base tax rate, provided however, that the base tax rate shall not be less than six-tenths percent (0.6%) and shall not exceed three and four-tenths percent (3.4%).

600%

240%

200%

800%

200%

000%

The base tax rate calculated in accordance with subsection (5) of this section shall be used to determine the taxable wage rate effective the following calendar year for all covered employers except cost reimbursement employers as provided in subsections (7) and (8) of this section.
(7) Table of rate classes, tax factors and minimum and maximum taxable wage rates:

Each employer, except standard-rated employers, will be assigned to one (1) of the rate classes for eligible and deficit employers provided in subsection (7) of this section based upon the employer’s experience as determined under the provisions of sections 72-1319, 72-1319A, 72-1351 and 72-1351A, Idaho Code.

For each rate class provided in subsection (7) of this section, the department will multiply the base tax rate determined in accordance with subsection (5) of this section by the tax factor listed for that rate class in the table provided in subsection (7) of this section. The product obtained from this calculation shall be the taxable wage rate for employers assigned to that rate class, provided however, that the taxable wage rate shall not be less than the minimum taxable wage rate assigned to that rate class and shall not exceed the maximum taxable wage rate assigned to that rate class in the table provided in subsection (7) of this section.

For standard-rated employers, the department will multiply the base tax rate determined in accordance with subsection (5) of this section by the tax factor listed for standard-rated employers in the table provided in subsection (7) of this section. The product obtained from this calculation shall be the taxable wage rate for standard-rated employers, provided however, that the taxable wage rate shall not be less than the minimum taxable wage rate assigned to standard-rated employers and shall not exceed the maximum taxable wage rate assigned to standard-rated employers in the table provided in subsection (7) of this section.

Deficit employers who have been assigned a taxable wage rate from deficit rate class 6 will be assigned contribution rates equal to their taxable wage rate.

All other eligible, standard-rated and deficit employers will be assigned contribution rates equal to ninety-seven percent (97%) of their taxable wage rate. Provided however, that for each calendar year a reserve tax is imposed pursuant to section 72-1347A, Idaho Code, the contribution rates for employers assigned contribution rates pursuant to this paragraph shall be eighty percent (80%) of their taxable wage rate.

1

—

12

0.2857

0.180%

0.960%

2

12

24

0.4762

0.300%

3

24

36

0.5714

0.360%

1.920%

4

36

48

0.6667

0.420%

5

48

60

0.7619

0.480%

2.560%

6

60

72

0.8571

0.540%

2.880%

7

72

—

0.9524

0.600%

1.000

1.000%

3.4%

-1

—

30

1.7143

1.080%

-2

30

50

1.9048

1.200%

-3

50

65

2.0952

1.320%

5.600%

-4

65

80

2.2857

1.440%

-5

80

95

2.6667

1.680%

6.400%

-6

95

—

2.6667

5.400%

6.800%

(8) Each covered employer, except cost reimbursement employers, will be assigned a taxable wage rate and a contribution rate as follows:

(9) Each employer shall be notified of his taxable wage rate as determined for any calendar year pursuant to this section and section 72-1351, Idaho Code. Such determination shall become conclusive and binding upon the employer, unless within fourteen (14) days after notice as provided in section 72-1368(5), Idaho Code, the employer files an application for redetermination, setting forth his reasons therefor. Reconsideration shall be limited to transactions occurring subsequent to any previous determination which has become final. The employer shall be promptly notified of the redetermination, which shall become final unless an appeal is filed within fourteen (14) days after notice as provided in section 72-1368(5), Idaho Code. Proceedings on the appeal shall be in accordance with the provisions of section 72-1361, Idaho Code.